District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.82

Appointment of the Attorney General.

(a)

Until such time as an Attorney General is elected under § 1-204.35, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to § 1-523.01.

(b)

The Attorney General shall:

(1)

Serve a 4-year term to coincide with the term for Mayor; and

(2)

Be eligible for reappointment by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, and may serve in a holdover capacity at the expiration of his or her term pursuant to § 1-523.01(c).

(c)

This section shall not apply to the incumbent Attorney General on May 27, 2010.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 102, 57 DCR 3012
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 201, 60 DCR 15487
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1163, 61 DCR 9990
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote (a) which read “Until such time as an Attorney General is elected under § 1-204.35, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to § 1-523.01.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 deleted “which time shall not be before January 1, 2018” following “under § 1-204.35” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1163 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1163 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1163 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 201 of the act shall apply as of December 13, 2013.